Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1879.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION; HOMEOWNERSHIP EDUCATION, COUNSELING, AND TRAINING PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the housing development fund. This transfer is $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the housing development fund to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency for the homeownership education, counseling, and training program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.209. Of the amount appropriated for the homeownership education, counseling, and training program, ten percent in fiscal year 2026 and ten percent in fiscal year 2027 are for the Minnesota Homeownership Center to administer and monitor the program and to support the provision of culturally appropriate counseling and education services to those with limited English proficiency or limited access to technology. new text end